District of Columbia statutes.
9-431.02

Penalty; prosecution.

Any person violating any of the provisions of § 9-431.01 shall on conviction thereof in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia be punished by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000; and in default of payment of such fine such person shall be confined in the workhouse of the District of Columbia for a period not exceeding 6 months; and all prosecutions shall be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, in the name of the District of Columbia.

June 18, 1898, 30 Stat. 477, ch. 467, § 8
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Sept. 13, 1978, D.C. Law 2-105, § 3, 25 DCR 1982
1981 Ed., § 7-621.
1973 Ed., § 7-616.